Utah statutes.
58-31b-501.   Unlawful conduct.

"Unlawful conduct" includes:

(1)  using the following titles, names or initials, if the user is not properly licensed or certified under this chapter:

(a)  nurse;

(b)  licensed practical nurse, practical nurse, or L.P.N.;

(c)  medication aide certified, or M.A.C.;

(d)  registered nurse or R.N.;

(e)  registered nurse practitioner, N.P., or R.N.P.;

(f)  registered nurse specialist, N.S., or R.N.S.;

(g)  registered psychiatric mental health nurse specialist;

(h)  advanced practice registered nurse;

(i)  nurse anesthetist, certified nurse anesthetist, certified registered nurse anesthetist, or C.R.N.A.; or

(j)  other generally recognized names or titles used in the profession of nursing;

(2) (a)  using any other name, title, or initials that would cause a reasonable person to believe the user is licensed or certified under this chapter if the user is not properly licensed or certified under this chapter; and

(b)  for purposes of Subsection (2)(a), it is unlawful conduct for a medication aide certified to use the term "nurse"; and

(3)  conducting a nursing education program in the state for the purpose of qualifying individuals to meet requirements for licensure under this chapter without the program having been approved under Section 58-31b-601.



Amended by Chapter 291, 2006 General Session

